Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 53.11, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (5) The site requested is on school property and a question to approve a bond, an instructional support program, an educational improvement program, a physical plant and equipment levy, or public education and recreation levy issued by any school appears on the ballot to be voted at that election. Sec. 2. Section 53.11, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: Senate File 140, p. 2 6. The commissioner shall remove or obscure from the view of voters any published material displaying the name of a candidate or elected official and any published material relating to a public measure, other than a ballot or sample ballot or envelope. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 140, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor